Utah statutes.
78A-6-1001.    Jurisdiction over adults for offenses against minors -- Proof
of delinquency not required for conviction.
(1)  The court shall have jurisdiction, concurrent with the district court or
justice court otherwise having subject matter jurisdiction, to try adults for
the following offenses committed against minors:
(a)  unlawful sale or supply of alcohol beverage or product to minors in
violation of Section 32A-12-203;
(b)  failure to report abuse or neglect, as required by Title 62A, Chapter 4a,
Part 4, Child Abuse or Neglect Reporting Requirements;
(c)  harboring a runaway in violation of Section 62A-4a-501;
(d)  misdemeanor custodial interference in violation of Section 76-5-303;
(e)  contributing to the delinquency of a minor in violation of Section
76-10-2301; and
(f)  failure to comply with compulsory education requirements in violation of
Section 53A-11-101.5.
(2)  It is not necessary for the minor to be found to be delinquent or to have
committed a delinquent act for the court to exercise jurisdiction under
Subsection (1).
